Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297F.01, subdivision 10b, is amended to read: Subd. 10b. Moist snuff. "Moist snuff" means any finely cut, ground, or powdered smokeless tobaccodeleted text begin , or similar product containing nicotine,deleted text end that is intended to be placed or dipped in the mouth. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297F.01, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Tobacco products. (a) "Tobacco products" means any product containing, made, or derived from tobacco that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, smoked, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, snorted, sniffed, or ingested by any other means, or any component, part, or accessory of a tobacco product, including, but not limited to, cigars; cheroots; stogies; periques; granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking tobacco; snuff; snuff flour; cavendish; plug and twist tobacco; fine-cut and other chewing tobacco; shorts; refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of tobacco; but does not include cigarettes as defined in this section. Tobacco products includes nicotine solution products deleted text begin and moist snuffdeleted text end . Tobacco products excludes any tobacco product that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco cessation product, as a tobacco dependence product, or for other medical purposes, and is being marketed and sold solely for such an approved purpose. (b) Except for the imposition of tax under section 297F.05, subdivisions 3 and 4, tobacco products includes a premium cigar, as defined in subdivision 13a. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end